Utah statutes.
58-74-502.   Unprofessional conduct.
"Unprofessional conduct" includes:
(1)  conduct unbecoming a person licensed as a certified court reporter or
which is detrimental to the interests of the public;
(2)  willful or negligent betrayal or disclosure of confidential information
about which the licensee becomes knowledgeable as a result of or incidental to
his practice as a licensee;
(3)  false or deceptive representation of a licensee's skills, competence,
capability, or resources as a certified court reporter;
(4)  offering, undertaking, or agreeing to undertake an assignment as a
certified court reporter for which the licensee is not qualified, for which
the licensee cannot complete the assignment in a timely manner, or for which
the licensee does not have the resources to complete the assignment as agreed
in a professional manner;
(5)  the use of any chemical, drug, or alcohol in any unlawful manner or in
any manner which negatively affects the ability of the licensee to competently
practice as a certified court reporter;
(6)  willfully and intentionally making any false or fraudulent record in the
performance of his duties as a certified court reporter;
(7)  any conduct contrary to the recognized standards and ethics of the
profession of a certified court reporter;
(8)  gross incompetence in practice as a certified court reporter;
(9)  violation of any provision of this chapter, Section 78A-2-404, or rules
promulgated to regulate the practice of court reporters;
(10)  conviction of a felony or any other crime which is considered by the
board to represent activity detrimental to the public interest as that
interest is reflected in the licensee continuing to practice as a certified
court reporter; or
(11)  attesting to or "signing off" on the transcript of any recorded
proceeding unless that proceeding was recorded by that person while physically
present at the proceeding or was personally transcribed by that person from an
electronically recorded process.
